Hawaii statutes.
[§89E-9] Matching funds. The governor
may provide funds to obtain matching federal moneys to retrain employees in the
state executive branch who separated from service under this chapter. [L Sp
2016 2d, c 1, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next